nl: Configuratie mandoline-element: Contact/transducer; Interne microfoon; Magnetisch; Magnetisch + piëzo (mix); Geen (akoestisch); Piëzo (brug/onder het zadel); Piëzo + microfoon (mix); Anders
zh-CN: 曼陀林拾音器配置: 接触式/换能器; 内置麦克风; 磁性; 磁性 + 压电（混合）; 无（原声）; 压电（琴桥/弦枕下）; 压电 + 麦克风（混合）; 其他
ja: マンドリン受取構造: コンタクト/トランスデューサー; 内蔵マイク; マグネティック; マグネティック+ピエゾ (ブレンド); なし (アコースティック); ピエゾ (ブリッジ/アンダーサドル); ピエゾ+マイク (ブレンド); その他
sv: Utformning av pickup för mandolin: Kontakt/omvandlare; Intern mikrofon; Magnetisk; Magnetisk + piezo (blandning); Ingen (akustisk); Piezo (stall/under sadel); Piezo + mikrofon (blandning); Annat
th: รูปแบบระบบรับเสียงของแมนโดลิน: คอนแทค/ทรานสดิวเซอร์; ไมโครโฟนภายใน; แม่เหล็ก; แม่เหล็ก + เปียโซ (ผสม); ไม่มี (อะคูสติก); เปียโซ (บริดจ์/ใต้แซดเดิล); เปียโซ + ไมโครโฟน (ผสม); อื่นๆ
it: Configurazione del pickup del mandolino: A contatto/trasduttore; Microfono interno; Magnetico; Magnetico + piezoelettrico (misto); Nessuno (acustico); Piezoelettrico (ponte/sottosella); Piezoelettrico + microfono (misto); Altro
ro-RO: Configurația pick-upului de mandolină: Contact/transductor; Microfon intern; Magnetic; Magnetic + piezo (mixt); Fără (acustic); Piezo (căluș/sub căluș); Piezo + microfon (mixt); Altele
pt-BR: Configuração dos captadores do bandolim: Contato/transdutor; Microfone interno; Magnético; Magnético + piezo (mistura); Nenhuma (acústico); Piezo (ponte/rastilho); Piezo + microfone (mistura); Outro
lt-LT: Mandolinos daviklio konfigūracija: Kontaktinis / keitiklis; Vidinis mikrofonas; Magnetinis; Magnetinis ir pjezo (mišrus); Nėra (akustinis); Pjezoelektrinis (tiltelis / po balneliu); Pjezo ir mikrofonas (mišrus); Kita
zh-TW: 曼陀林拾音器配置: 接觸式/換能器; 內建麥克風; 磁性; 磁性 + 壓電 (混合); 無 (原聲); 壓電 (琴橋/下弦枕); 壓電 + 麥克風 (混合); 其他
pl: Konfiguracja przetworników mandoliny: Kontaktowy / przetwornik; Mikrofon wewnętrzny; Magnetyczny; Magnetyczny + piezo (mieszany); Brak (akustyczny); Piezo (mostek / pod siodełkiem); Piezo + mikrofon (mieszany); Inne
ru: Конфигурация звукоснимателей мандолины: Контактный/трансдьюсер; Внутренний микрофон; Магнитный; Магнитный + пьезо (комбинированный); Нет (акустический); Пьезо (в бридже / под порожком); Пьезо + микрофон (комбинированный); Другое
es: Configuración de micrófonos de la mandolina: De contacto/transductor; Micrófono interno; Magnético; Magnético + piezoeléctrico (mezcla); Ninguna (acústica); Piezoeléctrico (puente/debajo del sillín); Piezoeléctrico + micrófono (mezcla); Otra
nb: Pickup-konfigurasjon for mandolin: Kontakt/transduser; Intern mikrofon; Magnetisk; Magnetisk og piezo (blanding); Ingen (akustisk); Piezo (stol/undersadel); Piezo og mikrofon (blanding); Annet
bg-BG: Конфигурация на адаптерите на мандолината: Контактен/трансдюсер; Вътрешен микрофон; Магнитен; Магнитен + пиезо (смесен); Няма (акустичен); Пиезо (магаре/под седлото); Пиезо + микрофон (смесен); Друго
pt-PT: Configuração do captador do bandolim: Contacto/transdutor; Microfone interno; Magnético; Magnético + piezo (mistura); Nenhum (acústico); Piezo (ponte/sob o rastilho); Piezo + microfone (mistura); Outro
tr: Mandolin manyetik konfigürasyonu: Temaslı/transdüser; Dahili mikrofon; Manyetik; Manyetik + piezo (karışık); Yok (akustik); Piezo (köprü/eşik altı); Piezo + mikrofon (karışık); Diğer
ko: 만돌린 픽업 구성: 접점/트랜스듀서; 내장 마이크; 마그네틱; 마그네틱 + 피에조(혼합); 없음(어쿠스틱); 피에조(브리지/언더새들); 피에조 + 마이크(혼합); 기타
fi: Mandoliinin mikrofonikonfiguraatio: Kontaktimikrofoni/pietsosähköinen; Sisäinen mikrofoni; Magneettinen; Magneettinen + pietso (yhdistelmä); Ei mitään (akustinen); Pietso (talla/tallanalus); Pietso + mikrofoni (yhdistelmä); Muu
sl-SI: Konfiguracija odjemnikov zvoka za mandolino: Kontaktni/pretvorniški; Notranji mikrofon; Magnetni; Magnetni in piezo (mešano); Brez (akustično); Piezo (mostiček/podsedelni); Piezo in mikrofon (mešano); Drugo
hu: Mandolin hangszedő konfiguráció: Kontakt / transzduktor; Belső mikrofon; Mágneses; Mágneses + piezo (kevert); Nincs (akusztikus); Piezo (húrláb / alsónyereg); Piezo + mikrofon (kevert); Egyéb
cs: Konfigurace snímačů pro mandolínu: Kontaktní/piezoelektrický; Vnitřní mikrofon; Magnetický; Magnetický + piezo (kombinovaný); Žádný (akustická); Piezo (v kobylce / pod sedlem); Piezo + mikrofon (kombinovaný); Jiné
fr: Configuration des micros d'une mandoline: Contact / transducteur; Micro interne; Magnétique; Magnétique et piézo (mélange); Aucun (acoustique); Piézo (chevalet / sous sillet); Piézo et micro (mélange); Autre
da: Konfiguration af mandolintransducer: Kontakt/transducer; Indbygget mikrofon; Magnetisk; Magnetisk + piezo (blend); Ingen (akustisk); Piezo (bro/under sadel); Piezo + mikrofon (blend); Andet
sk-SK: Konfigurácia snímačov na mandolínu: Kontaktný snímač / prevodník; Interný mikrofón; Magnetický; Magnetický + piezoelektrický (kombinovaný); Žiadna (akustická); Piezoelektrický (v kobylke / pod sedlom); Piezoelektrický + mikrofón (kombinovaný); Iná
vi: Cấu hình bộ khuếch đại âm thanh của đàn mandolin: Cảm biến tiếp xúc; Micro tích hợp bên trong; Từ tính; Từ tính + piezo (kết hợp); Không có (acoustic); Piezo (ngựa đàn/dưới yên); Piezo + micro (kết hợp); Khác
hr-HR: Konfiguracija pickupa mandoline: Kontaktni/transducer; Unutarnji mikrofon; Magnetski; Magnetski i piezoelektrični (kombinacija); Nema (akustični); Piezoelektrični (most / ispod sedla); Piezoelektrični i mikrofon (kombinacija); Ostalo
en: Mandolin pickup configuration: Contact/transducer; Internal microphone; Magnetic; Magnetic + piezo (blend); None (acoustic); Piezo (bridge/undersaddle); Piezo + microphone (blend); Other
el: Διαμόρφωση μαγνητών μαντολίνου: Επαφής/μορφοτροπέα; Εσωτερικό μικρόφωνο; Μαγνητικό; Μαγνητικό + πιεζοηλεκτρικό (μεικτό); Κανένα (ακουστικό); Πιεζοηλεκτρικό (γέφυρας/κάτω από τον καβαλάρη); Πιεζοηλεκτρικό + μικρόφωνο (μεικτό); Άλλο
de: Tonabnehmerart der Mandoline: Kontakt/Transducer; Internes Mikrofon; Magnetisch; Magnetisch + Piezo (Mischung); Keine (akustisch); Piezo (Steg/Untersattel); Piezo + Mikrofon (Mischung); Sonstige